modules/nlb/book-to-pef/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
.vas9soleior./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spann./ss=s,3,2
.vasspa1
.vas9spanna./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spannene./ss=s,3,2
.vasspan1ne
.vasspan1nen
.vas9spannet./ss=s,3,2
.vasspan1net
.vas9spanni./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spegel./ss=s,3,2
.vas1speg
.vasspe1ge
.vasspe1gel
.vas9spegelen./ss=s,3,2
.vasspege1len
.vas9speglane./ss=s,3,2
.vas1spegla
.vasspeg1la1n
.vas9speglar./ss=s,3,2
.vasspeg1lar
.vas9speielen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9speil./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spei1la./ss=s,3,2
.vas9speilene./ss=s,3,2
.vasspei1le
.vasspei1len
.vas9speilet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spilla./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spille./ss=s,3,2
.vasspil1le
.vas9spillet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spilli./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spissmu2s./ss=s,3,2
.vasspiss1mus1
.vas9spissmusa./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spissmu1sen./ss=s,3,2
.vasspissmu1sen
.vas9spissmusene./ss=s,3,2
.vasspiss1musene
.vas9spissmusi./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spissmysene./ss=s,3,2
.vasspissmy1s1
.vasspissmy1sen
.vas9spissmyser./ss=s,3,2
.vasspissmy1ser
.vas9sport./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sportane./ss=s,3,2
.vasspor1tane
.vas9s1por1tar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sporten./ss=s,3,2
.vasspor1ten
.vas9spor1tene./ss=s,3,2
.vasspor1tene
.vas9spor1ter./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spre1der./ss=s,3,2
.vas1spr
.vasspred1
.vasspre1de
.vasspre1der
.vas9spredere./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprede1ren./ss=s,3,2
.vassprede1ren
.vas9sprede1rer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprederne./ss=s,3,2
.vasspreder1ne
.vas9sprei1ar./ss=s,3,2
.vas1spre1i
.vas9spreiarane./ss=s,3,2
.vassprei1aran
.vas9spreiarar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreiaren./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreier./ss=s,3,2
.vasspre1ie
.vas9spreiere./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spreieren./ss=s,3,2
.vasspreie1ren
.vas9spreierer./ss=s,3,2
.vasspreie1rer
.vas9spreierne./ss=s,3,2
.vassprei1ern
.vas9sprin2g./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprin1gen./ss=s,3,2
.vassprin1ge
.vas9springene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9springer./ss=s,3,2
.vassprin1ger
.vas9sprut./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprutane./ss=s,3,2
.vasspru1ta
.vassprut1ane
.vas9sprutar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9spruten./ss=s,3,2
.vasspru1ten
.vas9sprøyt./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sprø
.vas9sprøy1ta./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprøyten./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sprøytene./ss=s,3,2
.vassprøy1tene
.vas9sprøyter./ss=s,3,2
.vassprøy1ter
.vas9sprøytet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stam2p./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sta
.vas9stampane./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stampar./ss=s,3,2
.vasstam1par
.vas9stam1pen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstam1pe
.vasstam1pen
.vas9stand./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standane./ss=s,3,2
.vasstan1da
.vasstan1dane
.vas9stan1dar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstan1de
.vasstan1den
.vas9standene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stan1der./ss=s,3,2
.vasstan1der
.vas9standsforskjell./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsfor1skj
.vas9standsforskjellen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsforskjel1len
.vas9standsforskjel1lene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsforskjeller./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsforskjel1ler
.vas9standshøgd./ss=s,3,2
.vas1stan1dsh
.vasstands1høg
.vas9standshøgda./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standshøgdene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1dene
.vas9standshøgder./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1der
.vas9standshøgdi./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandshøg1di
.vas9standsmerka./ss=s,3,2
.vasstan1dsme1r
.vasstands1merk
.vasstandsmer1ka
.vas9standsmerke./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmer1ke
.vas9standsmer1kene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstands1me1rken
.vas9standsmer1ker./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmerket./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmer1ki./ss=s,3,2
.vasstandsmer1ki
.vas9standsmå1ler./ss=s,3,2
.vasstan1dsmå
.vasstandsmå1ler
.vas9standsmålere./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmåle1ren./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmålerer./ss=s,3,2
.vas9standsmålerne./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoff./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffa./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fen
.vas9stof1fer./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fer
.vas9stoffet./ss=s,3,2
.vasstof1fet
.vas9stoffi./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksid./ss=s,3,2
.vas1stoffp
.vasstoffpe1ro
.vas9stoffperoksida./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stoffperoksi1dene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperoksi1den
.vas9stoffperoksi1der./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperoksi1der
.vas9stoffperoksi1det./ss=s,3,2
.vasstoffperoksi1det
.vas9strau2m./ss=s,3,2
.vas9straumen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrau1men
.vas9strimer./ss=s,3,2
.vas1stri1mer
.vas9strø2m./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strømmen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrøm1men
.vas9strømmene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strøm1mer./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrøm1mer
.vas9strålane./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrå1l
.vas1stråla
.vasstrå1lan
.vas9strå1lar./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strå1le./ss=s,3,2
.vas1strå1le
.vas9strålen./ss=s,3,2
.vasstrå1len
.vas9strålene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9strålen2s./ss=s,3,2
.vas9stråler./ss=s,3,2
.vas1stråler
.vas9styre1makt./ss=s,3,2
.vassty1
.vassty1re
.vassty1remak
.vas9styremak1ta./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyre1makta
.vas9styremaktene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyremak1ten
.vas9styremak1ter./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyremak1ter
.vas9styres1makt./ss=s,3,2
.vas9styresmak1ta./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyres1makta
.vas9styresmaktene./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyresmak1ten
.vas9styresmak1ter./ss=s,3,2
.vasstyresmak1ter
.vas9syk./ss=s,3,2
.vas9syke./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sykere./ss=s,3,2
.vassy1kere
.vas9sykest./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sykes
.vas9sykeste./ss=s,3,2
.vassy1keste
.vas9sykt./ss=s,3,2
.vas1sykt
.vas9søl./ss=s,3,2
.1vassø
.vas9søla./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søle./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sølene./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1len1
.vas9søler./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sølet./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søli./ss=s,3,2
.vas9sølone./ss=s,3,2
.vassø1lo1
.vas9sølor./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søyla./ss=s,3,2
.vassøy1l
.vassøy1la
.vas9søyle./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylen./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylene./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søyler./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylone./ss=s,3,2
.vas9søylor./ss=s,3,2
.vat9teppa./tt=t,3,2
.vat9teppe./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1pe
.vat9teppene./tt=t,3,2
.vat9tepper./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1per
.vat9teppet./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1pet
.vat9teppet2s./tt=t,3,2
.vatteppets1
.vat9teppi./tt=t,3,2
.vattep1pi
.vek9kvar1vo./kk=k,3,2
.vekk1v
.vekkva1r
.vil9lak2s./ll=l,3,2
.vil1lak
.vil9lak1sen./ll=l,3,2
.villak1sen
.vil9laksene./ll=l,3,2
.vill1ak1sene
.vil9laksen2s./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lak1ser./ll=l,3,2
.villak1ser
.vil9laksstamme./ll=l,3,2
.vil1lakss
.villaks1sta
.villaksstam1me
.vil9laksstammen./ll=l,3,2
.villaksstam1men
.vil9laksstammene./ll=l,3,2
.vil9laksstammer./ll=l,3,2
.villaksstam1mer
.vil9led./ll=l,3,2
.vil1led
.vil9leda./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledelse./ll=l,3,2
.vi1l1ledel
.vil9ledelsen./ll=l,3,2
.villedel1sen
.vil9ledelsen2s./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledende./ll=l,3,2
.ville1den
.ville1dend
.villeden1de
.vil9le1der./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledere./ll=l,3,2
.villede1re
.vil9lede1ren./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lede1rer./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lederne./ll=l,3,2
.villeder1ne
.vil9lede2s./ll=l,3,2
.ville1des
.vil9le1det./ll=l,3,2
.vil1le1det
.vil9le1dete./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lednin2g./ll=l,3,2
.villed1n
.vil9lednin1gen./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledningene./ll=l,3,2
.vil9ledningen2s./ll=l,3,2
.villednin1gens
.vil9ledninger./ll=l,3,2
.villednin1ger
.vil9lei./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leia./ll=l,3,2
.ville1ia
.vil9leiande./ll=l,3,2
.villeian1
.vil9leiast./ll=l,3,2
.vil1leias
.vil9leid./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leidd./ll=l,3,2
.ville1idd
.vil9leidde./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leide./ll=l,3,2
.villei1de
.vil9leie./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lei1ede./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiende./ll=l,3,2
.villei1end
.vil9le1ier./ll=l,3,2
.villei1er
.vil9lei1e2s./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiet./ll=l,3,2
.villei1et
.vil9leiete./ll=l,3,2
.vil9lei1in2g./ll=l,3,2
.vil1leii
.villei1in
.vil9leiinga./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiingane./ll=l,3,2
.villei1in1ga1n
.vil9leiingar./ll=l,3,2
.vil9leiin1gen./ll=l,3,2
.vil1leiin1ge
.vil9leiingen2s./ll=l,3,2
.villeiin1gens
.vil9leiingi./ll=l,3,2
.vil1leiingi
.vil9leitt./ll=l,3,2
.vil1leit
.visit9tid./tt=t,5,2
.vi1sitt
.visit9tida./tt=t,5,2
.visit9ti1den./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tidene./tt=t,5,2
.visit9tiden2s./tt=t,5,2
.visittide1ns
.visit9ti1der./tt=t,5,2
.visit1ti1der
.visit9tidi./tt=t,5,2
.vis9ska2p./ss=s,3,2
.vis1sk
.vis1ska
.vitas9stillin2g./ss=s,5,2
.vitasstil1li
.volleybal9la2g./ll=l,9,2
.vol1ley
.volley1ba
.volleybal1lag
.volleybal9laga./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lagene./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballa1gen
.volleybal9laget./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballa1get
.volleybal9laget2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lag2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal1lags
.volleybal9landskam2p./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballands1kam
.volleybal9landskam1pen./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandskam1pe
.volleybal9landskampene./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandskam1pene
.volleybal9landskampen2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballands1kampens
.volleybal9landskam1per./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballands1kamper
.volleybal9landsla2g./ll=l,9,2
.volleyball1ands1l
.volleybal9landslaga./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslagene./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9landslaget./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballandsla1get
.volleybal9landslaget2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9le1der./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballe1der
.volleybal9ledere./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballede1re
.volleybal9lede1ren./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9lederen2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleybal9ledere2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballede1res
.volleybal9lederne./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballeder1ne
.volleybal9lederne2s./ll=l,9,2
.volleyballeder1nes
.wat9ti1mane./tt=t,3,2
.watti1
.wattim1
.watti1mane
.wat9timar./tt=t,3,2
.wat9time./tt=t,3,2
.wat9timen./tt=t,3,2
.watti1men
.wat9timene./tt=t,3,2
.wat9ti1mer./tt=t,3,2
.watti1mer
.øredob9behengt./bb=b,6,2
.øre1dob
.øredob1be
.øredob1behe
.øredobbe1he1ng
.øredob9behengte./bb=b,6,2
.øvrevol9lø2p./ll=l,7,2
.øvre1v
.øvrevol9løpa./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevol1løpa
.øvrevol9løpene./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevol9lø1pet./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevolløp1et
.øvrevol9løpet2s./ll=l,7,2
.øvrevollø1pets
.ålmen9nytta./nn=n,5,2
.ål1men
.ål1menny
.ålmen1nyt1ta
.ålmen9nyttane./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyt1tar./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nytte./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen1nyt1te
.ålmen9nytten./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyttene./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennytte1ne
.ålmen9nytter./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyt1ti2g./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt1ti
.ålmen9nyttigare./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt1tigar
.ålmen9nyttigast./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyttiga1s
.ålmennytti1gast
.ålmen9nyttigaste./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyttige./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen9nyttone./nn=n,5,2
.ålmen1nytto
.ålmen9nyttor./nn=n,5,2
.ålmennyt1tor
